Missouri, session 2026, SB1644.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 376.1068, to read as
follows:
376.1068. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Anti-steering clause", a provision in a provider
network contract that restricts the ability of a general
contracting entity to encourage an enrollee to obtain a
health care service from a competitor of the provider,
including offering incentives to encourage enrollees to use
specific providers;
(2) "Anti-tiering clause", a provision in a provider
network contract that:
(a) Restricts the ability of a general contracting
entity to introduce or modify a tiered network plan or
assign providers into tiers; or
(b) Requires a general contracting entity to place all
members of a provider in the same tier of a tiered network
plan;

SB 1644 2
(3) "Covered individual", an individual who is covered
under a health benefit plan;
(4) "Enrollee", the same meaning given to the term in
section 376.1350;
(5) "Facility", the same meaning given to the term in
section 376.1350;
(6) "Gag clause", a provision in a provider network
contract that restricts the ability of a general contracting
entity or provider to disclose:
(a) Price or quality information, including the
allowed amount, negotiated rates or discounts, fees for
services, or other claim-related financial obligations
included in the contract, to a governmental entity as
authorized by law or its contractors or agents, an enrollee,
a treating provider of an enrollee, a plan sponsor, or
potential eligible enrollees and plan sponsors; or
(b) Out-of-pocket costs to an enrollee;
(7) "General contracting entity", a person who enters
into a direct contract with a provider for the delivery of
health care services to covered individuals regardless of
whether the person, in the ordinary course of business,
establishes a provider network for access by another party.
The term "general contracting entity" shall not include a
health care provider or facility unless the provider or
facility is entering into the contract in the provider's or
facility's role as a health benefit plan;
(8) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to
the term in section 376.1350;
(9) "Health care service", the same meaning given to
the term in section 376.1350;
(10) "Most-favored-nation clause", a provision in a
provider network contract that:

SB 1644 3
(a) Prohibits or grants an option to prohibit:
a. A provider from contracting with another general
contracting entity to provide health care services at a
lower rate; or
b. A general contracting entity from contracting with
another provider to provide health care services at a higher
rate;
(b) Requires or grants an option to require:
a. A provider to accept a lower rate for health care
services if the provider agrees with another general
contracting entity to accept a lower rate for the services;
or
b. A general contracting entity to pay a higher rate
for health care services if the entity agrees with another
provider to pay a higher rate for the services;
(c) Requires or grants an option to require
termination or renegotiation of an existing provider network
contract if:
a. A provider agrees with another general contracting
entity to accept a lower rate for providing health care
services; or
b. A general contracting entity agrees with a provider
to pay a higher rate for health care services; or
(d) Requires:
a. A provider to disclose the provider's contractual
reimbursement rates with other general contracting entities;
or
b. A general contracting entity to disclose the
general contracting entity's contractual reimbursement rates
with other providers;
(11) "Provider", the same meaning given to the term in
section 376.1350;

SB 1644 4
(12) "Provider network contract", a contract between a
general contracting entity and a provider for the delivery
of, and payment for, health care services to a covered
individual.
2. A provider shall not:
(1) Offer to a general contracting entity a written
provider network contract that includes an anti-steering,
anti-tiering, gag, or most-favored-nation clause;
(2) Enter into a provider network contract that
includes an anti-steering, anti-tiering, gag, or most-
favored-nation clause; or
(3) Amend or renew an existing provider network
contract previously entered into with a general contracting
entity so that the contract as amended or renewed adds or
retains an anti-steering, anti-tiering, gag, or most-favored-
nation clause.
3. Any provision in a provider network contract that
is an anti-steering, anti-tiering, gag, or most-favored-
nation clause is void and unenforceable. The remaining
100 provisions in the provider network contract shall remain in
101 effect and are enforceable.
102 4. A health benefit plan issuer that encourages an
103 enrollee to obtain a health care service from a particular
104 provider, including offering incentives to encourage
105 enrollees to use specific providers, or that introduces or
106 modifies a tiered network plan or assigns providers into
107 tiers has a good faith duty to the enrollee or policyholder
108 to engage in that conduct for the benefit of the enrollee or
109 policyholder.
✓